Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 24 Flour and Bread

21-24-1.
Definitions.

“Department” means the department of health.

“Director” means the director of health.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, or any group of persons whether incorporated or not, engaged in the commercial manufacture or sale of flour, white bread, or rolls.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1.

21-24-2.
Regulations.

All bakery products, cereal flours, and related products regulations and any amendments to them adopted by the federal government pursuant to the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, CFR 21, Parts 136, entitled “Bakery Products,” and 137, entitled “Cereal Flours and Related Products,” are the regulations in this state. The department may by regulation provide for modification or deviation from these regulations where the interest of Rhode Island consumers may warrant, whether or not the modifications or deviations are in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.; provided, the amendments do not interfere with interstate commerce. A federal regulation automatically adopted pursuant to this chapter takes effect in this state on the date it becomes effective as a federal regulation. The director shall publish a notice of the adoption in a newspaper having general circulation throughout the state. A person who may be adversely affected by a regulation may, within thirty (30) days after a federal regulation is automatically adopted, file with the director, in writing, objections and a request for a hearing. The timely filing of substantial objections to a federal regulation automatically adopted stays the effect of the regulation. If no substantial objections are received and no hearing is requested within thirty (30) days after publication of a notice of the adoption of a federal regulation, it shall be effective as of the date it was adopted by the federal government. If timely substantial objections are made to a federal regulation within thirty (30) days after it is automatically adopted, the director, after notice, shall conduct a public hearing in accordance with the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42. The director of health is authorized to adopt any regulations for bakery products, cereal flours, and related products that he or she deems necessary in accordance with authority granted under this chapter, chapter 31 of this title, chapter 27 of this title, and §

23-1-18(5)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 51.

21-24-3.
Corn and corn meal.

Nothing in this chapter or the regulations adopted or in effect pursuant to this chapter shall supersede the provisions of chapter 25 of this title as it relates to “Rhode Island corn” and corn meal made from Rhode Island corn.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1.

21-24-4.
Enforcement of provisions.

Enforcement of this chapter shall be in accordance with the provisions of §§

23-1-20

—

23-1-24

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 51.

21-24-5.
Investigative powers.

For the purpose of enforcement of this chapter and the regulations in effect or adopted pursuant to this chapter, the director, or the officers or employees under his or her supervision as he or she may designate, is authorized to take samples for analysis and to conduct examinations and investigations, and to enter at reasonable times any factory, mill, bakery, warehouse, shop, or establishment where cereal flours, bread, rolls, or related products are manufactured, processed, packed, sold, or held, or any vehicle being used for their transportation, and to inspect the place or vehicle and any flours, bakery products, or related products in the place or vehicle, and all pertinent equipment, materials, containers, and labeling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1.

21-24-6.
Penalties for violations.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or the orders, rules, or regulations promulgated by the director under authority of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 1 of title 23 pertaining to violation of laws administered by the director of health or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to the director’s authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 39.

21-24-7.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of it as may be required, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1.

21-24-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or of any rule or regulation made pursuant to this chapter or the application of it to any person or circumstances is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter, rule, or regulation, and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected by that invalidity. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 76, § 1.